Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.130

Violations—Civil penalties—Consumer protection act.

(1) Any private vocational school or agent violating RCW 28C.10.060, 28C.10.090, or 28C.10.110 or the applicable agency rules is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars for each separate violation. Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. Multiple violations on a single day may be considered separate violations. The fine may be imposed by the agency under RCW 28C.10.120, or in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) In addition to the penalties authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any violation of any provision of this chapter is also a violation of RCW 19.86.020 of the consumer protection act, pursuant to RCW 28C.10.210. The penalties authorized under subsection (1) of this section do not preclude remedies available under the provisions of the consumer protection act.

[ 2018 c 203 s 8; 1986 c 299 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.